Missouri, session 2026, SB952.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 1.410, 1.420, 1.430, 1.440, 1.450,
1.460, 1.470, 1.480, and 1.485, RSMo, are repealed and seven
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
1.410, 1.420, 1.450, 1.460, 1.470, 1.480, and 1.485, to read as
follows:
1.410. 1. Sections 1.410 to 1.485 shall be known and
may be cited as the "Second Amendment Preservation Act".
2. The general assembly finds and declares that:
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 952 2
(1) The general assembly of the state of Missouri is
firmly resolved to support and defend the Constitution of
the United States against every aggression, whether foreign
or domestic, and is duty-bound to oppose every infraction of
those principles that constitute the basis of the union of
the states because only a faithful observance of those
principles can secure the union's existence and the public
happiness;
(2) Acting through the Constitution of the United
States, the people of the several states created the federal
government to be their agent in the exercise of a few
defined powers, while reserving for the state governments
the power to legislate on matters concerning the lives,
liberties, and properties of citizens in the ordinary course
of affairs;
(3) The limitation of the federal government's power
is affirmed under Amendment X of the Constitution of the
United States, which defines the total scope of federal
powers as being those that have been delegated by the people
of the several states to the federal government and all
powers not delegated to the federal government in the
Constitution of the United States are reserved to the states
respectively or the people themselves;
(4) [If the federal government assumes powers that the
people did not grant it in the Constitution of the United
States, its acts are unauthoritative, void, and of no force;
(5)] The several states of the United States respect
the proper role of the federal government but reject the
proposition that such respect requires unlimited
submission. [If the federal government, created by a
compact among the states, were the exclusive or final judge
of the extent of the powers granted to it by the states

SB 952 3
through the Constitution of the United States, the federal
government's discretion, and not the Constitution of the
United States, would necessarily become the measure of those
powers. To the contrary, as in all other cases of compacts
among powers having no common judge, each party has an equal
right to judge for itself as to whether infractions of the
compact have occurred, as well as to determine the mode and
measure of redress. Although the several states have
granted supremacy to laws and treaties made under the powers
granted in the Constitution of the United States, such
supremacy does not extend to various federal statutes,
executive orders, administrative orders, court orders,
rules, regulations, or other actions that collect data or
restrict or prohibit the manufacture, ownership, or use of
firearms, firearm accessories, or ammunition exclusively
within the borders of Missouri; such statutes, executive
orders, administrative orders, court orders, rules,
regulations, and other actions exceed the powers granted to
the federal government except to the extent they are
necessary and proper for governing and regulating the United
States Armed Forces or for organizing, arming, and
disciplining militia forces actively employed in the service
of the United States Armed Forces;
(6) The people of the several states have given
Congress the power "to regulate commerce with foreign
nations, and among the several states", but "regulating
commerce" does not include the power to limit citizens'
right to keep and bear arms in defense of their families,
neighbors, persons, or property nor to dictate what sorts of
arms and accessories law-abiding Missourians may buy, sell,
exchange, or otherwise possess within the borders of this
state;

SB 952 4
(7) The people of the several states have also granted
Congress the powers "to lay and collect taxes, duties,
imports, and excises, to pay the debts, and provide for the
common defense and general welfare of the United States" and
"to make all laws which shall be necessary and proper for
carrying into execution the powers vested by the
Constitution of the United States in the government of the
United States, or in any department or office thereof".
These constitutional provisions merely identify the means by
which the federal government may execute its limited powers
and shall not be construed to grant unlimited power because
to do so would be to destroy the carefully constructed
equilibrium between the federal and state governments.
Consequently, the general assembly rejects any claim that
the taxing and spending powers of Congress may be used to
diminish in any way the right of the people to keep and bear
arms;
(8)] (5) The general assembly finds that the federal
excise tax rate on arms and ammunition in effect prior to
January 1, 2021, which funds programs under the Wildlife
Restoration Act, does not have a chilling effect on the
purchase or ownership of such arms and ammunition;
[(9) The people of Missouri have vested the general
assembly with the authority to regulate the manufacture,
possession, exchange, and use of firearms within the borders
of this state, subject only to the limits imposed by
Amendment II of the Constitution of the United States and
the Constitution of Missouri; and
(10)] (6) The general assembly of the state of
Missouri strongly promotes responsible gun ownership,
including parental supervision of minors in the proper use,
storage, and ownership of all firearms; the prompt reporting

SB 952 5
100 of stolen firearms; and the proper enforcement of all state
101 gun laws. The general assembly of the state of Missouri
102 hereby condemns any unlawful transfer of firearms and the
103 use of any firearm in any criminal or unlawful activity.
1.420. [The following federal acts, laws, executive
orders, administrative orders, rules, and regulations shall
be considered infringements on the people's right to keep
and bear arms, as guaranteed by Amendment II of the
Constitution of the United States and Article I, Section 23
of the Constitution of Missouri, within the borders of this
state including, but not limited to] The state of Missouri
and any of its political subdivisions, as well as the public
officials, employees, or agents of the state and any of its
political subdivisions, shall have no authority to assist in
the enforcement of the following types of federal acts,
laws, executive orders, administrative orders, rules, and
regulations within the borders of this state including, but
not limited to:
(1) Any tax, levy, fee, or stamp imposed on firearms,
firearm accessories, or ammunition not common to all other
goods and services and that might reasonably be expected to
create a chilling effect on the purchase or ownership of
those items by law-abiding citizens;
(2) Any registration or tracking of firearms, firearm
accessories, or ammunition;
(3) Any registration or tracking of the ownership of
firearms, firearm accessories, or ammunition;
(4) Any act forbidding the possession, ownership, use,
or transfer of a firearm, firearm accessory, or ammunition
by law-abiding citizens; and
(5) Any act ordering the confiscation of firearms,
firearm accessories, or ammunition from law-abiding citizens.

SB 952 6
1.450. [No entity or person, including any public
officer or employee of this state or any political
subdivision of this state, shall have the authority to
enforce or attempt to enforce any federal acts, laws,
executive orders, administrative orders, rules, regulations,
statutes, or ordinances infringing on the right to keep and
bear arms as described under section 1.420.] Nothing in
sections 1.410 to 1.480 shall be construed to prohibit
Missouri officials from accepting aid from federal officials
in an effort to enforce Missouri laws.
1.460. 1. Any political subdivision or law
enforcement agency that employs a law enforcement officer
who acts knowingly, as the word "knowingly" is defined under
section 562.016, to violate the provisions of section 1.450
or otherwise knowingly deprives a citizen of Missouri of the
rights or privileges ensured by Amendment II of the
Constitution of the United States or Article I, Section 23
of the Constitution of Missouri while acting under the color
of any state or federal law shall be liable to the injured
party in an action at law, suit in equity, or other proper
proceeding for redress, and subject to a civil penalty of
fifty thousand dollars per occurrence. Any person injured
under this section shall have standing to pursue an action
for injunctive relief in the circuit court of the county in
which the action allegedly occurred or in the circuit court
of Cole County with respect to the actions of such
individual. The court shall hold a hearing on the motion
for temporary restraining order and preliminary injunction
within thirty days of service of the petition.
2. In such actions, the court may award the prevailing
party, other than the state of Missouri or any political

SB 952 7
subdivision of the state, reasonable attorney's fees and
costs.
3. Sovereign immunity shall not be an affirmative
defense in any action pursuant to this section.
1.470. 1. Any political subdivision or law
enforcement agency that knowingly employs an individual
acting or who previously acted as an official, agent,
employee, or deputy of the government of the United States,
or otherwise acted under the color of federal law within the
borders of this state, who has knowingly, as the word
"knowingly" is defined under section 562.016, after the
adoption of this section:
(1) Enforced or attempted to enforce any of the
infringements identified in section 1.420; or
(2) Given material aid and support to the efforts of
another who enforces or attempts to enforce any of the
infringements identified in section 1.420;
shall be subject to a civil penalty of fifty thousand
dollars per employee hired by the political subdivision or
law enforcement agency. Any person residing in a
jurisdiction who believes that an individual has taken
action that would violate the provisions of this section
shall have standing to pursue an action.
2. Any person residing or conducting business in a
jurisdiction who believes that an individual has taken
action that would violate the provisions of this section
shall have standing to pursue an action for injunctive
relief in the circuit court of the county in which the
action allegedly occurred or in the circuit court of Cole
County with respect to the actions of such individual. The
court shall hold a hearing on the motion for a temporary

SB 952 8
restraining order and preliminary injunction within thirty
days of service of the petition.
3. In such actions, the court may award the prevailing
party, other than the state of Missouri or any political
subdivision of the state, reasonable attorney's fees and
costs.
4. Sovereign immunity shall not be an affirmative
defense in any action pursuant to this section.
1.480. 1. For the purposes of sections 1.410 to
1.485, the term "law-abiding citizen" shall mean a person
who is not otherwise precluded under state law from
possessing a firearm and shall not be construed to include
anyone who is not legally present in the United States or
the state of Missouri.
2. For the purposes of sections 1.410 to 1.480, the
term "material aid and support" shall include voluntarily
giving or allowing others to make use of lodging;
communications equipment or services, including social media
accounts; facilities; weapons; personnel; transportation;
clothing; or other physical assets. Material aid and
support shall not include giving or allowing the use of
medicine or other materials necessary to treat physical
injuries, nor shall the term include any assistance provided
to help persons escape a serious, present risk of life-
threatening injury.
3. It shall not be considered a violation of sections
1.410 to 1.480 to provide material aid to federal officials
who are in pursuit of a suspect when there is a demonstrable
criminal nexus with another state or country and such
suspect is either not a citizen of this state or is not
present in this state.

SB 952 9
4. It shall not be considered a violation of sections
1.410 to 1.480 to provide material aid to federal
prosecution for:
(1) Felony crimes against a person when such
prosecution includes weapons violations substantially
similar to those found in chapter 570 or 571 so long as such
weapons violations are merely ancillary to such prosecution;
or
(2) Class A or class B felony violations substantially
similar to those found in chapter 579 when such prosecution
includes weapons violations substantially similar to those
found in chapter 570 or 571 so long as such weapons
violations are merely ancillary to such prosecution.
5. The provisions of sections 1.410 to 1.485 shall be
applicable to offenses occurring on or after August 28, 2021.
1.485. If any provision of sections 1.410 to 1.485 or
the application [thereof] of such provision to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, such determination shall not
affect the provisions or applications of sections 1.410 to
1.485 that may be given effect without the invalid provision
or application, and the provisions of sections 1.410 to
1.485 are severable.
[1.430. All federal acts, laws, executive
orders, administrative orders, rules, and
regulations, regardless of whether they were
enacted before or after the provisions of
sections 1.410 to 1.485, that infringe on the
people's right to keep and bear arms as
guaranteed by the Second Amendment to the
Constitution of the United States and Article I,
Section 23 of the Constitution of Missouri shall
be invalid to this state, shall not be
recognized by this state, shall be specifically
rejected by this state, and shall not be
enforced by this state.]

SB 952 10
[1.440. It shall be the duty of the courts
and law enforcement agencies of this state to
protect the rights of law-abiding citizens to
keep and bear arms within the borders of this
state and to protect these rights from the
infringements defined under section 1.420.]
✓